This privacy policy describes how Vicinity Centres PM Pty Ltd ACN 101 504 045 ("
Vicinity
”, “
We
”, “
Our
” or “
Us
”) collects, uses and shares your data (including personal information) when you use the Chadstone App (the “
App
”). Vicinity is the operator and manager of Chadstone Shopping Centre (the “
Centre
”) and the App.
If you would like further information about our handling of personal information, you can refer to the Vicinity Privacy Policy available at
vicinity.com.au/privacy-policy
or contact Vicinity’s Privacy Officer using the contact and address details provided at the end of this policy. In addition to this policy, please note that some of our locations, products and services will include their own privacy notice within the App.
We will update this Privacy Policy from time to time to explain changes in how the App handles personal information. We will update the “Effective Date” at the top of this policy when we make such changes.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.vicinity.com.au/privacy-policy:
Main menu
About us
Portfolio
Retail Solutions
Investors
Sustainability
Newsroom
Contact us
Privacy Policy
On this page
1.  Introduction
2. Digital Services/Marketing, Gift Card and App Users
3.  Customers and Hotel Guests
4.  Retailers and Licensees
5.  Investors
6.  Service Providers
7.  Job Applicants
8.  Further Information and Your Rights
9. Contact Vicinity Centres' Privacy Officer
1.  Introduction
We value your trust so it’s important to us that we are transparent about how we use information from and about you. This Privacy Policy explains how and why we collect and handle personal information about you.
We are committed to creating destinations that make your experiences with us better, easier and more enjoyable. The information (including, in some cases, personal information) that we gather from your interactions with us helps us to better understand and influence how we:
shape our centres to meet your changing needs and expectations;
support our retailers to help them deliver an improved offer to you; and
continue to create destinations that are the hub of the communities in which we operate.
We will update this Privacy Policy to explain changes in our information handling practices from time to time. Please keep an eye on this website for updates. This Privacy Policy was last updated on 4 December 2024.
Please contact our privacy team using the contact details provided at the end of this policy if you, or a person you assist, would like:
further information about our handling of personal information; or
the information in this Privacy Policy explained to them or provided in a different format.
In addition to this policy, please note that some of our locations, products and services will include their own privacy notice and additional information about our handling of personal information.
Who are we?
Vicinity Centres ('
Vicinity
', '
we
', '
our
') is a leading property group which owns, develops and manages shopping centres and mixed-use properties across Australia. Vicinity Centres is made up of Vicinity Limited ABN 90 114 757 783, Vicinity Centres Trust ARSN 104 931 928 and their respective controlled entities, including Vicinity Centres PM Pty Ltd ABN 96 101 504 045.
Who is this Privacy Policy for?
This Privacy Policy describes how we collect and handle the personal information of our customers, hotel guests, digital services users, retailers, licensees, investors, service providers and job applicants.
Personal information generally refers to information which identifies you or from which you are reasonably identifiable. This can include your name, address, phone number, email address, date of birth, as well as in some circumstances photos and videos of you.
We generally collect personal information from you so that we can:
provide you with our services or obtain services from you;
lease or license space to you;
register you for our events, newsletters, promotions and loyalty programs;
operate our centres and digital services, including through the use of apps (which you may download), CCTV, device/website/app tracking and the logging of security, health and safety incidents;
respond to complaints, queries, feedback and disputes;
tailor our centre precinct and digital offerings to your activities, preferences and needs; and
conduct market research to obtain your feedback on your experiences with us.
If you contact us in person, via our websites or apps or by phone, email, letter or other communication, we collect your personal information so that we can provide you with an appropriate response, address any complaints, queries or feedback which you raise and maintain records of our communications. We also monitor your communications with us for security, dispute resolution and training purposes.
We collect sensitive information, such as:
health information, where required, for managing compliance with our health and safety obligations and responding to health and safety risks and incidents, including for the purpose of providing government health agencies with access to records to trace individuals who have been in contact with an individual diagnosed with coronavirus;
criminal offence details as part of employment screening and where individuals have committed, or are suspected of, criminal offences at our locations; and
biometric information, such as fingerprints, for the purposes of automated biometric verification of service provider personnel.
We also directly or through our service providers de-identify and aggregate information for the purpose of conducting visitor behavioural analytics to better understand and report on the experiences, purchasing behaviours, shopping centre movements, demographics and interests of our visitors, including the retailers, locations, app features and website pages that are most popular with our customers.
2. Digital Services/Marketing, Gift Card and App Users
When you use our Digital Services (including apps)
When you access, purchase, register for, or subscribe to our websites, apps, online services, social media channels, public WiFi or electronic communications ('
Digital Services
'), the kinds of information (including, in some cases, personal information) which we may collect both directly and through our service providers include:
your name, date of birth, gender, postcode, country of residence, email and mobile number;
your preferences, interests and demographic data which allows us to tailor our communications to you regarding centre news, events and promotions;
your location information, including dates, times and locations from which you access our Digital Services (including your proximity to other individuals);
your centre event booking details and centre product/service orders including product/service recipient and credit card/digital wallet payment details;
additional information, such as your photos and posts when you publish, message or otherwise share this information with us through our social media channels, mobile applications or websites; and
data about your use of these services including information about what parts of these services you access, what type of device you use to access them, your IP address, your device ID, the dates and times at which you use these services and usage data collected through certain website and application monitoring tools.
We link and collate profile information about your use of our shopping centres and Digital Services to improve and better tailor our in-centre offerings, marketing (including paid ads) and Digital Services to meet your needs. We also collate information about your use of our shopping centres and Digital Services in order to conduct market research surveys and collect your feedback on your in-centre and digital experiences and interactions with us.
We also collect information about your usage of our Digital Services by using cookie files and other tracking technology such as pixels in, and in relation to, our Digital Services. Tracking technologies can be used for a variety of purposes, such as:
to help us recognise you as a unique visitor to our websites and to store your individual preferences, so that we can customise our websites to reflect your interests;
to help us and our advertising affiliates monitor your use of our Digital Services and deliver a more relevant and personalised service to you, including through targeted advertisements and promotional offerings; and
system administration and to manage site security and store information about the type of browser and type of device being used.
You
can change the cookie settings by changing the relevant settings associated with your browser.  However, if you delete cookies, you may be unable to access some parts of our websites.
Pixels are used on our sites to improve and report on paid advertising. These pixels use industry standard technology to share information with our advertisers to help match users,  this then assists us and our advertisers to track your interactions with our ads and websites.
We also collect information relating to other unique identifiers such as Flash cookies (also known as local stored objects), IP addresses and device identifiers that help us understand device and browser interactions, and activity on our websites and in our centres.
We and our service providers may also use the information which you provide when subscribing to or accessing our Digital Services or viewing our online advertising to identify suitable target audiences for our promotional offerings, services and advertising.
You can unsubscribe from our email and SMS marketing by following the steps specified in any communications we send to you.  You can turn off targeted ad features in third party platforms by following the relevant third party platform provider's instructions, for example by turning off Personalized Ads in Google.
When you purchase or receive one of our digital gift cards
Our digital gift cards are distributed by Waivpay Ltd ACN 630 927 105 and issued by 545490 Pty Ltd trading as Karta Co ABN 83 648 605 225.
When you purchase or receive one of our digital gift cards, we collect your personal information in order to:
identify you;
consider your request for and provide you with a digital gift card;
perform administrative, reporting and operational tasks (including systems development and testing, staff training, and market or customer satisfaction research); and
prevent or investigate any fraud or crime (or a suspected fraud or crime) and as required by relevant laws and scheme rules.
Where you do not provide some or all of the information requested for the purchase or receipt of one of our digital gift cards, we may be unable to provide you with the card. If you need to resolve a privacy issue or make a privacy complaint about how personal information is collected, used or stored under or in connection with our digital gift card, please contact Waivpay directly at
support@waivpay.com
addressing your complaint to the Waivpay Privacy Officer.
If you are not satisfied with their response with regards to your privacy issue or complaint, you can contact Vicinity’s Privacy Officer using the contact details for Vicinity provided at the end of this Privacy Policy.
3.  Customers and Hotel Guests
When you visit our shopping centre precincts, the kinds of personal information we collect from you both directly and through our service providers includes:
When you enter our car parks or register with us for parking
At some of our centres, we use CCTV and other sensor technology within our car parks to collect your vehicle’s number plate details, images of your parked vehicle and other surveillance footage in order to:
monitor car park usage, dwell time and occupancy;
manage centre car parking operations and precinct security;
allow you to pay for parking using on-premise or online options;
help you to locate your vehicle; and
identify, or assist law enforcement or government bodies in identifying, persons or vehicles:
suspected of involvement in committing offences; or
being monitored for public health and safety purposes.
If you choose to register with us for parking, we collect your name, email address, postcode, telephone number, vehicle number plate, vehicle make, vehicle model and credit card details and, where applicable, additional details such as disability parking permit details (where providing disability permit holders with certain free parking facilities) and residential or work address details (where you have registered for parking as a resident or worker at one of our mixed-use properties).
We use this information to:
manage your parking; and
allow you to pay for parking using our online options.
When you visit our shopping centre precincts
During your visit to any of our locations, we and our service providers:
collect CCTV
and other images both inside and outside our centres, including from centre entry and exit points and adjacent public areas (including roads and footpaths).  We collect and use these images:
to ensure the safety and security of those visiting and working at our locations;
to manage traffic flow at our locations;
for the protection of our lawful interests;
to identify, or assist law enforcement or government bodies in identifying, persons that are suspected of committing offences or who are being monitored for public health and safety management purposes;
offer public WiFi services
if you choose to register and provide us with your contact details or social media ID:
we collect from your use of our WiFi:
MAC address, device ID, IP address assigned to the device, type of device and type of web browser you are using;
the dates, times and locations from which you access our WiFi (including your proximity to other individuals);
the websites which you access using our WiFi; and
if you sign onto our WiFi using a social media ID, publicly available social media posts, personal information and demographic data which we obtain from those social media platforms;
we use this information in combination with other information which we collect to improve our services as well as:
conduct market research and consumer behavioural analytics;
send you promotions, surveys and other marketing materials where you have consented for us to do so or where this is otherwise permissible by law;
manage the security of our centres and networks; and
to identify, or assist law enforcement or government bodies in identifying, persons that are suspected of committing offences or who are being monitored for public health and safety management purposes.
offer mobility equipment for hire
within our shopping centres if you provide us with your name, address, phone and email address as part of your hirer registration record. We also ask to sight your driver’s licence details in some of our centres for security reasons and to verify your identity;
run centre events and services
, such as fashion launches, centre tours, bus services, festive events, holiday programs and community walking clubs for which we collect your name, contact details, emergency contact details (and in some cases residential address and credit card details for paid events) as part of registering you for these services;
offer shopping centre gift cards
(physical or digital) for which we ask you to provide your name and contact details as part of providing you with your gift card purchase and managing our gift card fulfilment operations;
run competitions and promotions
for which we ask you to provide your name, contact details, month and year of birth, gender and certain additional details such as a photo, video or social media post, depending on the type of competition we are running;
log health and safety incidents
that take place at our locations and collect the details of those involved in, or witness to, the incident (including injury, health, safety and risk information);
manage public health and safety risks
, including by maintaining visitor registers, logging COVID questionnaire responses and monitoring visitor movement for the purposes of managing COVID-related risks.  Where public health and safety risk is identified for individuals that have been at our locations, we may disclose known information regarding such individuals to governmental bodies for public health and safety management purposes including name, contact details, CCTV footage, MAC address details (if known), location details and proximity between individuals at our locations;
log actual or suspected offences or other prohibited conduct
which takes place at our centres and collect the name, contact details, incident details from those involved including witnesses, as well as photographs and CCTV footage;
offer you the chance to subscribe to centre news and future loyalty programs
by providing your name, contact details, gender, country of residence, month and year of birth; and
conduct market research surveys and interviews
as part of collecting your feedback on how we can improve the experience at our locations. We may ask for your name and contact details when conducting market research for the purpose of arranging follow-up interviews so that we can better understand your experience at our centres.
Other reasons why we collect your information:
when permitted or required by law;
when you report an incident, lose a family member or friend or property within our centres, make a complaint, make an inquiry or request assistance from our customer service desk, centre management office or security officers, or provide other feedback to us;
where devices are enabled, or identifiable, we conduct device monitoring via in centre-infrastructure, including the collection of MAC addresses, and location update information from such devices for the purposes of understanding centre arrival and departure time, occupancy, dwell time, traffic flow monitoring and shopper behaviour analytics; and
we also use people counters and traffic flow tools which help us better understand and track how busy our centres are, to assist us to comply with laws, regulations and other legal requirements regarding the number of persons permitted in certain areas.
When you visit Hotel Chadstone Melbourne MGallery by Sofitel
We are committed to providing Hotel guests with a seamless experience that connects Hotel Chadstone to the broader Chadstone Shopping Centre precinct. When you visit or book to stay at Hotel Chadstone, personal information collected by Accor as the Hotel Manager appointed to operate Hotel Chadstone will be used to:
manage your booking and provide you with access to Hotel Chadstone facilities and services;
manage and operate Hotel Chadstone facilities and services as well as comply with legal obligations;
tailor and improve the quality of your hotel experience based on your feedback; and
where consented to, provide you with Accor marketing communications.
The kinds of personal information collected as part of your booking or visit to Hotel Chadstone may include:
for Hotel reservations,
your name, country of residence, nationality, address, phone number, email address, passport and reservation details;
for Hotel bars, restaurants and events,
including dining at Altus Rooftop or Pastore Restaurant, your name, contact details, COVID questionnaire responses, body temperature and dietary requirements.
Personal information collected by Accor in connection with Hotel Chadstone is shared with:
hotel service providers as well as other Accor Group legal entities and service providers, some of which are located in a country other than Australia, for the purposes described above; and
Vicinity as the property manager for Hotel Chadstone and the broader Chadstone Shopping Centre precinct for the purpose of planning and overseeing Hotel Chadstone operations, providing Chadstone Shopping Centre marketing communications as well as improving the quality of your Chadstone experience.
For more information about Accor and how it handles your personal information, please refer to Accor’s Customer Personal Data Protection Charter available at
Customer Personal Data Protection Charter (accor.com)
. For privacy related queries, access, correction or deletion requests, or complaints about Accor’s handling of your personal information, please contact
data.privacy@accor.com
.
4.  Retailers and Licensees
In addition to the above information collected from individuals visiting our centres, the kinds of personal information which we collect from retailers and licensees both directly and through our service providers include:
If you lease, license or apply to lease or license space from us
The types of personal information which we collect from you (as an actual or prospective tenant, licensee or assignee) include:
from retailers and licensees:
name, address, date of birth, contact and insurance details, job position as well as information on your business experience, trading history, financial capacity and personal and business assets and liabilities;
from guarantors:
name, address, date of birth, contact details, information on your business experience, trading history, financial capacity as well as personal and business assets and liabilities; and
from retailer or licensee personnel:
name, job position, contact details and any other information required for registering retailer personnel for centre services, such as retailer car parking programs for which we collect vehicle number plate details.
We use this information to:
assess whether to grant a lease, licence or other rights to use our facilities or services;
manage our relationship, agreements, payment processing and communications with you (including notices issued under lease or licence);
manage and operate the centres in which you lease or license space from us;
monitor the performance of our centres;
contact you in the event of a security incident or emergency;
understand your interests, preferences and activities as a retailer or licensee at our centres; and
conduct market research surveys and interviews to gather feedback and better understand how to improve the retailer or licensee experience at our shopping centres.
Our
Vicinity Connect Platform for retailers and licensees
If you are a retailer or licensee and you use the Vicinity Connect Platform (
'Platform'
) your use of the Platform is governed by Terms of Use which are made available on the Platform.  In the course of your use of the Platform:
we may collect your contact details, email address and company name on registering for access to the Platform;
we may also collect from your interactions with the Platform your dates and times of Platform access, the URL of Platform webpages visited, your IP address, cookie data and device identifiers (including device type and browser type) which help us understand device and browser interactions; and
we will share with you and other retailers and licensees, aggregated and de-identified data and insights in relation to retail activities in our centres Australia-wide.
5.  Investors
If you invest in us in an individual capacity, MUFG Corporate Markets (AU) Limited (formerly Link Market Services Limited), the service provider which manages our security holder registry:
collects personal information from you including your contact details, bank account information, tax file number and other information which it requires to carry out its functions;
uses this information for purposes including the payment of distributions and dividends as well as the sending of annual and half yearly reports, notices of meetings and notifications to the Australian Taxation Office;
collects some of this information pursuant to laws including the Income Tax Assessment Acts and the Corporations Act 2001 (
Cth
), which also requires us to make some securityholder details available to members of the public on request;
is provided with your queries and contact details by us if you contact us as a securityholder; and
provides us with your contact details for the purposes of our communications with you.
Further information
For more information about MUFG Corporate Markets and how it handles your personal information, please refer to the MUFG Pension & Market Services privacy policy on their website (link below) or contact MUFG Corporate Services by email, phone or post:
Email:
privacy.officer.au@mpms.mufg.com
Phone:
+61 1300 887 890
(free call within Australia)
Website:
MUFG Pension & Market Services Global Privacy Policy
Post:
Privacy Officer
MUFG Pension & Market Services,
Locked Bag A14
SYDNEY SOUTH   NSW   1235
Australia
6.  Service Providers
If you or a company which you work for provides goods or services to us, we collect personal information in order to manage our relationship with you, including for the purposes of registering your visits to our locations as well as managing onboarding, health and safety checks and compliance processes which apply to our service providers, including COVID-19 questionnaires and body temperature checks.
The kinds of personal information which we collect from you if you are service provider personnel may include:
name, address, date of birth, contact details and employment screening results (including reference, background, criminal record and eligibility to work checks);
insurance details as well as information on licences, permits and  qualifications which you possess;
information about your financial standing and business experience;
registers which record the start and end time of your visits or work at our properties (which in some circumstances is collected via biometric fingerprint scanners or mobile phone geolocation-based check in); and
health and safety screening results from your onboarding/site questionnaire responses.
We collect this personal information directly from you and from others, such as your representatives, referees, current and previous employers, professional and trade associations as well as law enforcement agencies, employment screening providers and publicly available sources such as LinkedIn.
7.  Job Applicants
If you apply to work with us, we collect the information which we require to consider your application for employment, consider and contact you about other positions and manage our employment relationship with you if you are successful in becoming a member of our team.
The kinds of personal information which we collect when you apply for employment with us includes:
your name, address, date of birth and contact details;
work experience, qualifications, employment history and resume;
tax file number and bank account details; and
employment screening results (including reference, background, criminal record and eligibility to work checks).
We collect this information directly from you as well as from others, such as  our representatives, referees, academic institutions, current and previous employers, professional and trade associations as well as law enforcement agencies, publicly available sources such as LinkedIn as well our employment screening service provider Fit2Work which is owned by Equifax Australia Workforce Solutions Pty Limited ABN 86 080 799 720 (previously the Mercury Group of Companies).
Further information
For more information about Fit2Work and how it handles your personal information, please refer to the Equifax Privacy Policy at
Equifax HR Solutions | Terms and Conditions
.
8.  Further Information and Your Rights
From whom do we collect your personal information?
We may collect your personal information directly from you or from third parties, such as:
our service providers;
our retailers and licensees;
our related entities;
our property owners, joint venture partners, hotel managers and property managers (including those from whom we acquire a centre); and
from public registers.
We also collect information which does not identify you from third parties, such as data businesses and public sources, such as Census data.
We may share your personal information with third parties, including:
our service providers who assist us
with:
developments, technology services, marketing, communications, research and analytics;
business advisory services (including recruitment, legal, accounting and audit);
car park operations, hotel operations, utilities, cleaning and security services;
call centre, contract management and administrative services, including mailing, delivery and archiving services; and
insurance, banking, payment processing and debt collection services;
with other users of our websites, apps or social media channels
where you have chosen to share your personal information with those users through your use of that service;
with brokers, agents and advisers and persons acting on your behalf
for example, a custodian, asset consultant or person who holds a power of attorney;
with our related entities, joint venture partners and shopping centre owners
for whom we provide property management services as well as to prospective buyers or future property managers of our business or the properties which we manage;
with participants in the payments system
(including Stripe and EWay) and other financial institutions for the purpose of resolving disputes, errors or other matters arising out of your purchase or receipt of our products, services or gift cards;
with regulatory bodies, governmental agencies, law enforcement bodies or courts
where necessary in order to report actual or suspected offences, illegal or fraudulent activity to police or other enforcement agencies as well as to meet our legal and regulatory obligations, including in order to respond to warrants and other lawful information requests from courts as well as protect our lawful interests; and
as otherwise permitted or required by law.
Overseas disclosures
Generally, we use systems and services in Australia, however some of our investment activity and service providers are located overseas.
If you hold an investment that is issued overseas, the details of the rules relevant to that investment product were notified to you in the product offer document. If you are a securityholder residing outside Australia, we may also provide your information to authorities of the jurisdiction in which you reside such as tax authorities, banks and other permitted bodies to make distribution and dividend payments, comply with the laws of that jurisdiction and communicate with you or your representatives.
Some of our technology service providers also provide services, for example, hosting of our data in countries outside of Australia, including the United States, Singapore and Japan.
How do we store and protect your personal information?
We store personal information both electronically and in hard copy form, both at our premises and with the assistance of our service providers, including several cloud service providers. We have a number of security controls which we apply in relation to our people, processes and technology including:
internal data handling policies;
access controls; and
reasonable IT network security measures such as intrusion detection systems and protective security software applications.
However, no data transmission or storage on the internet can be guaranteed as completely secure.  While we strive to protect our data and are continually reviewing our security systems to improve them, we cannot ensure and do not warrant the absolute security of the data we collect.
Data breach response
Please notify us immediately if you become aware of any misuse, interference or loss or any unauthorised access, modification or disclosure of personal information held by us (
'Data Breach'
) or any other security incident affecting data held by us using the contact details provided at the end of this policy.
If we become aware of a Data Breach, we will promptly investigate the incident, and take reasonable steps to contain and remedy the breach.  To help you maintain the security of your personal information, we will take steps to notify you as soon as practicable if we believe that the Data Breach would likely result in serious harm to you.  Where possible, we will provide you with recommendations on the steps that you can take in response to the breach.
After investigating a Data Breach, we may disclose information to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner and to law enforcement agencies about the incident in order to comply with our reporting obligations under the Privacy Act, and to enable the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner and law enforcement agencies to assess and investigate the incident.
How can you seek access, correction or updates to the personal information which we hold about you?
If you are a customer, retailer, licensee, service provider or job applicant, you can seek access, correction or updates to personal information which we hold about you by contacting our privacy team using the details provided at the end of this policy.
If you are a securityholder, you can contact Link using the details provided in the 'For Investors' section for access, correction or update requests in relation to personal information which Link collects about you on our behalf. For all other investors, please contact your fund manager or other applicable investment representative.
There is no fee charged by Vicinity for accessing your information. We endeavour to respond to your access request within 30 days of receiving the request. Before we give you access to information, we will need to confirm you are appropriately authorised to access the information, which may include an identity verification process. In certain circumstances we are allowed to deny your access request or limit the access we provide. For example, we may not provide you with access to records which contain the personal information of others.
It is also important that we have your correct details, such as your current address and telephone number. You can ask us to correct any inaccurate information we hold or have provided to others by contacting us. If the information that is corrected is information we have provided to others, you can ask us to notify them of the correction. We don’t charge a fee for these requests. If we’re able to correct your information, we’ll inform you when the process is complete. If we disagree with the request to correct, we’ll let you know in writing and include our reasons. You may ask us to add a note of your correction request to the information we hold about you.
How can I make a complaint?
If you have a concern or complaint about our handling of your personal information, please contact our Privacy Officer using the details provided at the end of this policy. We’ll review your situation and work towards resolving it within a reasonable timeframe.
We acknowledge every complaint we receive, provide contact details of the investigating officer and keep you updated on the progress we’re making towards investigating the complaint.
Usually, it takes only a few days to investigate a complaint. However, if we’re unable to provide a final response within 30 days we’ll contact you to explain why and discuss an appropriate timeframe to investigate the complaint.
If you’re not satisfied with our handling of your matter, please let us know using the contact details below so we can ensure that you are given the benefit of our complaint processes.
If you are still not satisfied with the response, you can contact the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner by phone, online or post:
Phone:
+61 1300 363 992
Website:
oaic.gov.au
Post:
Office of the Australian Information Commissioner
GPO Box 5218
SYDNEY   NSW   2001
How can I get further information about privacy?
For more information about privacy generally, you can also refer to the website for the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC) at
oaic.gov.au
or contact the OAIC using the contact details provided in the “How can I make a complaint?” section above.
9. Contact Vicinity Centres' Privacy Officer
For any privacy related queries, access or correction requests, or complaints, please contact our Privacy Officer by email, phone or post:
Email:
privacy@vicinity.com.au
Phone:
+61 3 7001 4000
Monday to Friday between 9.00am and 5.00pm Melbourne time
Post:
ATT: Privacy Officer
Vicinity Centres
Level 4, Chadstone Tower One
1341 Dandenong Road
CHADSTONE   VIC   3148
Australia
Discover Vicinity
About Us
Discover our company and how we operate
Portfolio
Unlocking value from our expansive footprint
Retail Solutions
Discover our impactful retail solutions
Sub-policy 1
https://stripe.com/au/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.waivpay.com/privacy:
Solutions
Support
About Us
Locations
News
Balance Check
Let’s Talk
Open menu
Waivpay
Privacy Policy
WAIVPAY is committed to respecting the privacy of all employees, customers and vendors, and complying with all applicable privacy laws.
These are set out in:
The Privacy Act 1988, which contains the Australian Privacy Principles (APPs) and in relevant privacy codes. See https://www.oaic.gov.au/privacy/australian-privacy-principles/read-the-australian-privacy-principles/
This Policy is intended to adopt the highest applicable privacy laws in Australia and outlines the circumstances surrounding the management of personal information in accordance with privacy laws.
Application of Policy
This Policy applies to all WAIVPAY dealings with individuals, including employees (past and present) and prospective employees. This Policy does not form part of any employee’s contract of employment.
Guiding Principles
WAIVPAY adopts a privacy by design approach and takes and ensure we take all reasonable steps to protect the personal information we collect or hold.
We only collect personal information that is necessary for the function or activity of our customer facing products and platforms
Ensure our procedures and systems are compliant with the APPs including complaints handling.
Make available an up-to-date and clear privacy policy specific to each application.
Take all reasonable steps to ensure that personal information collected is accurate, complete and up to date.
Provide individuals access to or correct their personal information on request.
Where possible de-identify personal information
Delete unsolicited personal information as soon as is practical, if it is not necessary for the function or activity of our customer facing products and platforms
We do not use any personal information other than the original purpose of its collection.
WAIVPAY has a privacy working group which consists of key business representatives and the CEO who meet quarterly or as needed to oversee and ensure all policies are up to date and clearly communicated across the company.
What is Personal Information?
Personal information
is information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is identifiable:
whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not (i.e. digitally or hard copy).
Sensitive information
is a special category of personal information includes information or an opinion about a person’s health, race or ethnic origin, political, religious or philosophical beliefs, membership of a trade union or association, criminal record, sex life, sexual orientation and genetic and ‘biometric’ information.
We also treat credit card or debit card information as sensitive and do not store any credit card or debit card details
We will only collect a person’s sensitive information where it is reasonably necessary for our business activities and with the person’s consent.
How does WAIVPAY Classify the data we process or store?
WAIVPAY classify data into four categories that determine the processing, handling, storage and use of the data and the associated protection controls and systems.
Classification
Description
Sensitive
Data that is defined by under the APP and examples include:
health (including predictive genetic information)
racial or ethnic origin
political opinions
membership of a political association, professional or trade association or trade union
religious beliefs or affiliations
philosophical beliefs
sexual orientation or practices
criminal record
Personal
Information that can be used to identify a data subject, either directly or in combination with other data or information.
Common examples are an individual’s name, signature, address, telephone number, date of birth, email address and commentary or opinion about a person.
Confidential
Business data, terms, performance, accounting commercials by either party that should not to expose to other entities.
Normal
General data that does not belong to any other categories.
For what purposes do we use personal information?
WAIVPAY only uses personal information which is reasonably necessary for our dealings with the relevant individual in the course of our business.
In general, we use personal information for the following purposes:
providing products or services that have been requested
communicating with the individual in fulfillment of the product or service
provide support for our product and services
complying with regulatory and legal obligations; or
In addition to the above purposes, we may also use personal information where an individual has consented to one or more specific purposes, or as necessary for compliance with our legal obligations, or otherwise for a legitimate purpose that is not overridden by the individual’s fundamental rights and freedoms. This includes accessing the contact list within an individual’s mobile device to pre-fill recipient data as part of the digital purchase form. This data is not stored or used in any other way.
What kinds of personal information do we collect?
The kinds of personal information that WAIVPAY collect will depend upon the specific product or service the relevant individual may have with us. We may collect information about:
purchasers or potential purchasers of our products
suppliers (for example, when establishing records and systems to enable payment for goods or services);
job applicants (for the purposes of employment)
employees or contractor records
The kinds of personal information may include, but are not limited to:
information that identifies purchasers such as name, address, delivery details, email address and any other information required to enable fulfillment of the product or service
information about a person that is required or authorised by law
How does we collect personal information?
We primarily collect information directly from individuals. However, in some cases, we may receive that information from other sources, such as a third party who discloses the information to us in connection with providing a product or service requested by the individual.
If we collect personal information directly from an individual, we will notify the individual, at the time of collection, of the following information:
Our identity and the contact details of our representative who handles privacy related enquiries and requests.
the facts and circumstances of the collection;
the purposes of collection;
the length of time we will keep the information;
the consequences if personal information is not collected;
how and to whom else we may disclose that personal information;
information about our Privacy Policy, including an individual’s right to access and seek correction of personal information we have about them; and
Where personal information has been collected indirectly (i.e. from a third party), we will notify the individual of the above matters as soon as reasonably practicable, unless doing so would be impossible or involve a disproportionate effort. In addition, we will inform the individual of the source from which we obtained the information.
To the extent practicable, we will also provide individuals with the option of deidentifying themselves or of using a pseudonym when dealing with us.
Direct marketing
WAIVPAY will provide a simple means by which individuals may opt-out of any direct marketing communications undertaken by WAIVPAY. WAIVPAY does not direct market to any purchaser’s or potential purchaser’s for products or services unless provided directly to the purchaser or potential purchaser by WAIVPAY Employees
Job applicants
WAIVPAY may collect personal information from job applicants in the course of the recruitment process.
Access to employment records
The Privacy Act, Australia gives employees the right to access certain statutory employment records, including:
their employment agreement
their time and wages records their leave records
Consent and withdrawal of consent
Where WAIVPAY relies on an individual’s consent to lawfully collect and use their personal information, that consent must be explicit (i.e. not implied), freely given, informed and specific (i.e. distinguishable from consent for other matters or purposes).
Individuals may withdraw their consent at any time by notifying us. We will then delete the individual’s Personal Information unless we have another legitimate basis to use that information. Withdrawal of consent may mean that we will no longer be able to offer the same products and services to the individual.
How long is Personal Information kept?
WAIVPAY keeps personal information only as long as necessary to fulfil the purpose for which it was collected. When we no longer need it for that purpose, we will destroy the information or ensure that the information is de-identified (i.e. it will no longer be possible to connect the information to the individual).
Generally speaking, we keep employee records for seven years or as required by law.
Overseas recipients of Personal Information
WAIVPAY does not disclose or release any personal information to entities or organisations in other countries (Overseas Recipients).
Right to access and correct
WAIVPAY takes all reasonable steps to ensure that the personal information it uses is accurate, up-to-date and complete. However, where this is not the case, individuals have a number of rights they may exercise:
Individuals have the right to:
access their personal information held by WAIVPAY
access information about where and for what purpose we have used their information
correct any incorrect information
If an individual makes a request for access to or correction of their personal information, we will respond within a reasonable period and, if reasonable and practicable to do so, we will:
provide the information, unless we consider that there is a sound and lawful reason to withhold it;
correct the information, if we are satisfied the information we hold is incorrect.
If we refuse to give access to or correct personal information as requested by an individual, we will explain our decision to the individual and advise them of mechanisms available to them to complain about that refusal.
Right to be forgotten
Individuals have the right to have their personal information erased in certain circumstances, including where the information is no longer relevant to the original purpose for which it was collected or where the individual withdraws their consent.
Right to object to or restrict use
Where WAIVPAY uses personal information without the individual’s consent (but pursuant to another legitimate purpose), the individual has the right to object to or restrict such use of their personal information.
Data breach notification
In the event of a data breach that is likely to result in serious harm to the individual, we will comply with mandatory data breach notification laws. This includes notification to the affected individual and, if the breach is in Australia, also to the Australian Information Commissioner.  Please refer to our Data Breach Response Plan.
Variations
We reserve the right to vary, replace or terminate this policy from time to time.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.eway.com.au/privacy-policy/:
Privacy Policy
At Web Active Corporation Pty Ltd (trading as Eway) (086 209 403), we respect your concerns about privacy. This Privacy Policy relates to the collection of personal information from users of our websites, mobile applications (“Apps”), email, branded social media sites or pages and other online or mobile services that link to or expressly reference this Policy (collectively the “Sites”).
For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, “Eway”, “we” and “us” refer to Web Active Corporation Pty Ltd (trading as Eway) and its related bodies corporate, as the context requires. Our privacy practices vary depending on the services we provide and the country-specific requirements for the countries in which we operate. For some products and services, where required, we will provide additional privacy notices before collecting your personal information. Please read this Privacy Policy carefully. If you have any questions, you may contact us at
gpaunz-legal@globalpay.com
or by the methods provided in the “Contact Us” section below.
Eway provides payment products and services for commercial and non-commercial enterprises. In the delivery of our services, we routinely collect and retain personal information about our customers and the individuals with whom our customers do business. For our customers, additional disclosures are set out in the documentation provided to them at or before onboarding. This Privacy Policy relates only to information we collect through our Sites and Apps and should be viewed as a supplement to any other notices or contractual terms provided to customers.
Eway collects personal information from users of our Sites and Apps who might be our Customers, prospective Customers, and Customer end users (“End Users”) who engage with our Sites as part of the Services we provide to our Customers.
Because our relationship with Customer End Users is indirect, we process such End User personal information only for the purposes of providing the Services, in accordance with our Customer’s instructions. Under applicable privacy laws, in this context, Eway would be considered a processor or service provider. If you are an End User who has a relationship with one of our Customers and you have a question about how your personal information is collected, used, or shared, or would like to exercise any rights you may have with respect to your personal information, please contact the Customer directly.
Select one of the links below to jump to the relevant section:
Personal Information We Collect
Sources of personal information
How we use the personal information we obtain
Our legal basis for collecting and using personal information
How we share the personal information we collect
Cookies and other tracking technologies
External Links
Our Relationship with Affiliate Companies (Including Sharing and Cross-Border Transfers)
Our Commitment to Data Security
Login Details and Your Responsibility
Managing Your Preferences
Your Rights
Changes and Updates
Choice of Law
Complaints
Contact Us
Personal Information We Collect
Subject to your consent if required by law, we may collect the following personal information:
Identifiers
including name and contact details including telephone number, email address and postal address;
Sensitive personal information
such as your driver’s license number (or the number and details of other types of identification, such as a passport or proof of age card), username and password, health/medical information, race, gender, ethnicity, etc.;
Commercial information
, such as information about your business and your preferences regarding products and related services which are of interest to you (see “Managing Your Preferences” below);
Internet/electronic activity
including information from cookies and other tracking technologies including location, device identifier, usage and browsing history;
Professional and employment related information
such as your status with the organization with which you are affiliated;
Education information
;
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory or similar information
;
Biometric identifiers
;
Geolocation
;
Information you provide
if you report a problem with our Sites; and
Records of any correspondence
we have with you.
Data Anonymization and Aggregation
:
Subject to your consent if required by law, we may anonymize or aggregate your personal information in such a way as to ensure that you are not identified or identifiable from it, in order to use the anonymized or aggregated data, for example, for statistical analysis including analysis of trends, to carry out actuarial work, to tailor products and services and to conduct risk assessments and analysis of costs and charges in relation to our products and services. We may share anonymized or aggregated data with our global affiliates and with other third parties. This Privacy Policy does not restrict Eway’s use or sharing of any non-personal, summarized, derived, anonymized or aggregated information.
Sources of personal information
Information that you provide to us
:
We collect personal information that you provide to us when you set up an account with us, use our services, or communicate with us. For example, if you register for an online account with us, we may request your name, contact information, and business information. Providing us with personal information about yourself is voluntary, and you can always choose not to provide certain information, but then you may not be able to take advantage of or participate in some of the services.
Information collected from third parties
:
We may collect information about you from third parties in the course of providing our services to you. For example, we may collect Identifiers and Commercial information from a referral partner or other third-party in order to contact you about the services we provide. We may also receive business related information about you from third party companies that supplement our business customer records with firmographic and professional information.
Information collected through technology
:
When you visit our Sites or Apps or interact with an email we send to you, we may collect certain information automatically such as your account or device identifier, and usage information such as pages that you visit, information about links you click, the types of content you interact with, the frequency and duration of your activities, and other information about how you use our services. You have the ability to express your preference regarding some of the ways we collect information through technology in some of our services (see “Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies” for more information). We may collect geolocation in the Sites or Apps for the purpose of enabling location-based Services.
How we use the personal information we obtain
Subject to your consent if required by law, we may use your personal information for the following business and commercial purposes:
To provide our Services to you;
To contact you regarding any inquiry you make or to fulfil a request, such as, for example, a request for information about our products and services;
To contact you if you have signed up for e-newsletters or any other updates, communications or publications;
To verify or maintain the quality and safety of our products and services and to improve, upgrade, or enhance our services;
To detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecute individuals responsible for that activity;
To enable internal record keeping and administration of records;
To personalize your experience when you use our Sites and Apps;
To track information about our interactions with you, including, but not limited to, counting advertising impressions to unique visitors and verifying positioning and quality of advertising impressions;
To send you direct marketing, subject to your consent if required by applicable law (see “Managing Your Preferences” below); and
To comply with applicable laws and regulations.
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is and how we use it. In some contexts, we will provide additional information about retention as you use the Services. When we collect your personal information, we will retain it only for as long as is necessary to complete the legitimate business or legal purposes for which we collected it. In many cases, the retention time period will correspond to the time period for which you have an account or other type of business relationship with us plus a defined period after that relationship ends which will be defined by our regulatory requirements.
Our legal basis for collecting and using personal information
Our legal basis for collecting, using and storing personal information may depend on the specific Service with which you are engaging. In most cases, when we process personal information on behalf of our Customer, our legal basis is the performance of a contract. In some contexts, such as when we engage in direct marketing, our legal basis for processing personal information is consent. If you are a merchant or applying for merchant services, we may also be required to collect certain personal information under the
Anti-Money Laundering and Counter-Terrorism Financing Act 2006
(Cth). When we rely on legitimate interest as the legal basis for our processing of personal information, we have procedures in place to ensure that we are balancing our interests and rights against the impact to the individual and their applicable statutory or fundamental rights.
How we share the personal information we collect
Eway is a subsidiary of Global Payments, Inc, which is a multinational business headquartered in the United States, with subsidiaries and affiliates in countries around the world. Your personal information may be disclosed to recipients located outside of your country, including to our global subsidiaries and affiliates (see “Our Relationship with Affiliate Companies” below) as described in this Privacy Policy.
For each category of personal information we collect, we may share such information in the manner and for the purposes described below:
With companies engaged to help us run our business, subject to your consent if required by law. These types of companies may include our affiliate companies, distributors of our products and services, service providers retained to perform functions on our behalf or to provide services to us, including (without limitation) legal, accounting, audit, consulting and other professional service providers, and providers of other services related to our business. Portions of our Services may be provided by organizations with which Eway has a contractual relationship, including subcontractors, and, accordingly, your personal information may be disclosed to them. We take steps aimed at ensuring that all such persons process your personal information as disclosed by us only as necessary to perform the Services and subject to a written contract which requires them to comply with applicable laws;
With third parties with whom you have a relationship, such as a financial institution or independent sales organization who referred you to Eway for services;
With logistics service providers to enable the delivery of packages to individuals;
With other third parties with whom you direct us to your personal information, subject to your specific consent for such data sharing;
With regulators including state and federal agencies, card payment networks, issuing banks and other parties required to enable compliance with laws, regulations and industry standards related to transaction processing and in order to obtain commercial and credit information to establish, maintain or renew a customer’s contract(s), as may be required to provide any of the services for which a customer has subscribed, or to comply with the rules and regulations of any credit or debit card payment network or otherwise in accordance with this Privacy Policy;
In response to a court order or a request for cooperation from a regulatory, law enforcement or other government agency; to establish or exercise our legal rights; to defend legal claims; or as otherwise required or permitted by applicable laws and/or regulations;
When we believe that disclosure is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding actual or suspected illegal activity, fraud, or other wrongdoing; to protect and defend the rights, property or safety of Eway, its customers, staff, suppliers or others; and
To purchasers and, subject to local legal requirements, prospective purchasers in the event that Eway and/or its global affiliate companies (as applicable) disposes of, or considers the disposition of, any of its/their business or assets.
We do not sell your personal information to third parties for monetary compensation. To the extent that we share your personal information with third parties for cross-context behavioural advertising, we will implement features within the Services that enable you to see a list of the entities with which the personal information is shared and which enable you to express your preferences. You can find additional information about how those third parties use personal information in the applicable third party privacy notice.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
Cookies and similar tracking technologies are used to help us retain information about your use of our Sites and Apps. Using cookies, we collect information like country location, language preference and other settings. Cookies can also help us to operate our Sites more efficiently, remember you for future visit and enhance your user experience by providing real-time tools including user guides and chatbots.
The cookies and tracking technologies that we may use on the Sites fall into the following categories:
Strictly Necessary
.
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions taken by you such as logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but blocking them may impede the functionality of the Sites and Apps.
Performance
.
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functionality
.
These cookies enable the Sites and Apps to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. They may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some of these services may not function properly.
Targeting
.
These cookies may be set through our Sites and Apps by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant advertisements on other sites. They are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
How to Delete or Block Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
:
On some Sites and Apps, when technically feasible, we will enable tools to help you make choices about cookies and other tracking technologies. You may also delete or block cookies at any time by changing your browser settings. You can click “Help” in the toolbar of your browser for instruction or review the cookie management guide produced by the Interactive Advertising Bureau available at www.allaboutcookies.org. If you delete or block cookies, some features of the Sites may not function properly.
External Links
Eway may provide links on our Sites and Apps to other websites that are not under our control. We do not endorse or make any warranty of any type regarding the content contained on such websites or products and services offered on those websites. We make no representation regarding your use of such websites. Please be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of the operators of other websites. We encourage our users to be aware when they leave our Sites and to read the privacy statements of each and every website that collects personal information. This Privacy Policy applies solely to information collected by us. You should read any other applicable privacy and cookies notices carefully before accessing and using such other websites.
Our Relationship with Affiliate Companies (Including Sharing and Cross-Border Transfers)
Subject to your consent if required by applicable law, we may appoint an affiliate company to process personal information in a service provider role. We will remain responsible for that company’s processing of your personal information pursuant to applicable data privacy laws.
Because our affiliate companies are located around the globe, your personal information may be transferred to and stored in the United States or in another country outside of the country in which you reside, which may be subject to different standards of data protection than your country of residence.
We take appropriate steps to ensure that transfers of personal information are in accordance with applicable law, are carefully managed to protect your privacy rights and interests and limited to countries which are recognized as providing an adequate level of legal protection or where alternative adequate arrangements are in place to protect your privacy rights.
Our Commitment to Data Security
We take seriously our responsibility to protect the security and privacy of the information we receive via our Sites and Apps. We maintain administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect the personal information you provide via the Sites and Apps against accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use.
Any suspected attempt to breach our policies and procedures, or to engage in any type of unauthorized action involving our information systems, is regarded as potential criminal activity. Suspected computer mischief may be reported to the appropriate authorities.
Please remember that communications over the internet such as emails are not secure. We seek to keep secure all confidential information and personal information submitted to us through this Website in accordance with our obligations under applicable laws and regulations. However, like all website operators, we cannot guarantee the security of any data transmitted through this Website.
When we no longer need your personal information to provide the Services, it will be securely deleted or de-identified in a manner that ensures you cannot be re-identified. Where we are collecting or storing your personal information on behalf of our Customer, the retention of your personal information may be subject to our contractual obligations to our Customer.
Login Details and Your Responsibility
Subject to your consent if required by law, we will collect and process your personal information as necessary to set up and administer your sign up to, and use of, the log in facility available on our Sites and Apps. We may use cookies to “remember” the machine or other device you use to access our Sites (see “Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies” below). Please remember that if we contact you, we will never ask you for your password in an unsolicited email, message or phone call. If you choose to use the log in facility available on our Sites and Apps, you are required to adhere to the security procedures we establish in the documentation we provide you as part of the services.
Managing Your Preferences
We may use your personal information to provide you with direct marketing information about our products and services as well as those of our global affiliates and third parties. Our direct marketing may be by email, telephone, post or SMS or such other method(s) as may become relevant. In addition, we may provide direct marketing information and permit others to do that as allowed by our customers’ respective contracts.
We will take steps to ensure that any direct marketing from us will provide a simple means for you to stop further communications, in accordance with applicable law. For example, in email, we may provide you with an “unsubscribe” link, or an email address to which you can send an opt-out request. You may also request to be removed from direct marketing correspondence by emailing us at
gpaunz-legal@globalpay.com
.
Your Rights
If you are an End User who interacts with our Sites or Apps for the purpose of engaging with our Customers and have questions about legal rights you may have with respect to your personal information collected by our Customer, please consult the Customer with which you have a relationship.
Subject to certain exemptions, and in some cases dependent upon the processing activity we are undertaking, you have the right to:
Know whether we process your personal information;
Know how your personal information is used;
Access, request and receive the personal information we have collected in a portable manner;
Object to having your personal information sold or shared.
You may contact us using the information in the Contact Us section of this Privacy Policy for additional information about how to exercise your rights.
Access to personal information
. Upon request, we will provide you with access to your personal information held by us, except in circumstances where refusing you access is required or authorised by law.
To request access to the information held by us about you, please contact us using the contact details listed below. We will respond to your request within a reasonable time after the request is made, and will advise you if we will not or cannot provide you access, together with the reasons for denying you access.
We reserve the right to charge you for providing access to your personal information. We will notify you of those costs prior to providing you with access to the information. We may require those costs to be paid prior to providing you with access.
Correction of personal information.
We take reasonable steps to ensure that the personal information collected by us is accurate, complete, relevant and up to date. If you believe that any of the personal information we hold about you requires correction, please inform us in writing using the contact details set out below.
Changes and Updates
We reserve the right, in our sole discretion, to modify, update, add to, discontinue, remove or otherwise change any portion of this Privacy Policy , in whole or in part, at any time. When we amend this Privacy Policy, we will revise the “Last Updated” date located at the bottom of the document. We will also take reasonable steps to ensure you are made aware of any material updates including providing you direct communication about such changes or providing a notification through the services, as appropriate. If you provide personal information to us or access or use our Sites after this Privacy Policy has been changed, you will be deemed to have unconditionally consented and agreed to such changes. The most current version of this Privacy Policy will be available on the Sites and Apps and will supersede all previous versions of this Privacy Policy.
Choice of Law
Except where prohibited by law, this Privacy Policy, including all revisions and amendments thereto, is governed by the laws of the Queensland, Australia, without regard to its conflict or choice of law principles which would require application of the laws of another jurisdiction.
Complaints
If you have a complaint about how we have collected, used or disclosed your personal information, or if we have not corrected or provided you with access to your personal information, then you may contact our support team using the contact details in the Contact Us section below so that we can investigate the complaint and respond to your concerns.
If you are not satisfied with our response, you can submit a complaint to:
In Australia: the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (see:
http://www.oaic.gov.au/privacy/privacy-complaints
);
In the EU: with your local data protection supervisory authority (see:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
).
Contact Us
Under the
Privacy Act 1988 (Cth)
, you have the right to request access to or correction of your personal information. If you have questions about this Privacy Policy, or if you want to exercise your rights as described in this Privacy Policy, you can submit a request by contacting us at:
Eway
Level 9, 2 King Street
Bowen Hills QLD 4006
Australia
Email:
gpaunz-legal@globalpay.com
In order to honour any access request, we will require you to provide enough information for us to verify your identity. For example, we may ask you for information associated with your account, including your contact information or other identifying information. If you designate an authorized agent to make a rights request on your behalf, we may require proper proof of that authorization as well as direct verification of your identity from you.
Privacy Policy last updated: 13 June 2023
Sub-policy 4
https://www.apple.com/au/legal/privacy/data/en/apple-pay/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Watch
Vision
AirPods
TV & Home
Entertainment
Accessories
Support
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Legal
Open Menu
Close Menu
Hardware
Software
Sales & Support
Internet Services
Intellectual Property
More Resources
English
Choose your preferred language
When you add a card to Apple Pay, card-related information, location and information about device settings and use patterns may be sent to Apple to determine eligibility.
Some of the above information, account-related information and paired device details may be shared with your card issuer or bank to determine eligibility and for anti-fraud purposes.
When you use Apple Pay in apps and on the web, information necessary to process the payment is shared with the app or website. Your actual card number isn’t shared with the merchant.
Apple Pay data that can no longer be tied to you may be used by Apple to improve Apple Pay and other Apple products and services.
Apple Pay is a technology service provided by affiliates of Apple Inc., which are responsible for your personal data.
Apple Pay allows you to make secure purchases in shops, in apps and on the web, using your debit, credit and prepaid cards.
Apple Pay is a technology service provided by affiliates of Apple Inc., which are responsible for your personal data. Your Apple Pay provider may differ depending on your location, such as Apple Payments Services LLC in the United States. For more information on Apple entities responsible for the processing of your personal data, visit Apple’s Privacy Policy at
apple.com/privacy
and Apple-Affiliated Companies at
www.apple.com/au/legal/privacy/en/affiliated-company
.
Adding Cards to Apple Pay
When you are adding a payment card like store, credit, debit and prepaid cards to Apple Pay, information you provide about your card, and whether certain device settings are enabled, may be sent to Apple in order to determine your eligibility to enable Apple Pay and its features. Your device may also evaluate device use patterns (for example, percentage of time device is in motion or approximate number of calls per week) to help identify fraud. The information evaluated by your device is not shared with Apple in a way that can be linked to you.
Your card issuer, payment network or provider authorised by your card issuer may share information about card features and benefits with Apple, such as whether it supports a rewards or instalments programme, to determine eligibility for certain Apple Pay features. Information may also be provided by Apple to those entities to enable Apple Pay, determine card eligibility, set up your card with Apple Pay and to prevent fraud, including:
Your credit, debit or prepaid card number
The name and billing address associated with your Apple Account
General information about your Apple Account activity (for example, whether you have a long history of transactions within iTunes)
Information about your device and, if using Apple Watch, the paired iOS device (for example, a device identifier, phone number, and the name and model, for both your Apple Watch and paired iOS device)
Location at the time you add your card (if you have Location Services enabled)
Account or device history of adding payment cards
Aggregated stats relating to the information from payment cards you’ve added or attempted to add to Apple Pay
When you add a card to Apple Pay using a third-party app such as a banking app, the app sends an account or card identifier to your device. This information is used by Apple and your card issuer to determine the eligibility of your card, set up your card with Apple Pay and to prevent fraud. To help you set up cards that you have or have recently had, on other devices, Apple stores a card reference with your Apple Account, which can be used with the card issuer or payment network to add the card again after entering the security code. Apple Pay does not store the original credit, debit or prepaid card number.
Paying with Apple Pay
When you begin a payment, to enable tax and shipping cost calculation your postcode or other equivalent information may be provided to the app, website or merchant. When you begin a payment within a third-party browser, the browser generates a QR code or an App Clip Code to scan with your Apple Pay–supporting device. Once scanned, Apple initiates a communication channel between the browser and the Apple Pay-supporting device, through which the browser and device share relevant transaction and billing and/or shipping information necessary to process the transaction.
If enhanced Apple Pay payment features such as the ability to pay with instalments or rewards are enabled, after you initiate an Apple Pay purchase, Apple will identify the payment options available to you based on what cards you have in your Wallet and the benefits and features of those cards, which are provided to Apple by the card issuers. You may also choose to have Apple identify additional payment options that may be available to you and that are not yet in your Wallet. To do so, Apple will use information about your transaction, such as merchant and amount, to determine whether additional payment methods are available for that transaction. Apple does not retain information about the transaction and the payment method eligibility check in a manner that is linked to you. If you choose to apply for a new payment method, your application information will be shared directly with the issuer and will not be seen or stored by Apple. To help you make informed financial decisions, if you choose to pay with rewards, Apple may use information about your card, card features and benefits, as well as the transaction merchant and amount, to fetch and display your current rewards balance, the rewards points (or equivalent) that would be charged for the transaction, and your rewards balance post transaction. To allow you to select the right instalment plan for your financial health, Apple provides your participating issuers with merchant and amount information, which they use to evaluate eligibility and provide Apple with a list of instalment options for display. Apple does not retain this information processed to provide enhanced Apple Pay payment features in a manner that is linked to you.
After you authorise the payment, other information requested by the merchant, such as a device- or merchant-specific account number, your postal address or email address, is also provided. The card number of your credit, debit or prepaid card is not provided when you use Apple Pay.
To help ensure that any recurring or other merchant-initiated charges like subscriptions are authorised by you, when you choose to provide eligible Apple Pay payment methods to participating merchants for recurring or merchant-initiated charges, your issuer and/or payment network will approve and generate a merchant-specific account number to be used for such charges. Only that merchant-specific account number can be used by a participating merchant to authorise transactions without you taking a specific action. Apple will know which merchants are associated with your merchant-specific account numbers, but not what you purchased or how much you paid for it. You can manage your merchant-specific account numbers in Wallet by tapping the card and tapping the More button to view card details.
For cards with certain enhanced fraud prevention, when you attempt an online or in-app transaction, your device will evaluate information about your Apple Account, device and location if you have enabled Location Services for Wallet, in order to develop on-device fraud prevention assessments. The output of the on-device fraud prevention assessments, but not the underlying data, will be sent to Apple and combined with information Apple knows about your device and account to develop Apple Pay transaction fraud prevention assessments. These transaction fraud prevention assessments may be shared with your payment network, together with a postal address identifier and IP address if available, in order to prevent fraud at the time of transaction. The postal address identifier differs per payment network and may be used to confirm whether postal addresses for different transactions using a particular card on your device are the same in a way that does not reveal the underlying address. You can check whether a card has this enhanced fraud prevention at any time by going to the back of your payment credential in Wallet. To prevent the sharing of fraud prevention assessments with your payment network, you can select another card.
When using an app or visiting a website through Safari that uses Apple Pay in iOS, watchOS or macOS, the app or website can check if you have Apple Pay enabled on that device. When visiting a website in Safari on an iOS device or Mac to which a card cannot be added, the website can check if you have Apple Pay set up on an iPhone or Apple Watch using the same Apple Account. You can disable websites you visit from checking if Apple Pay is enabled by changing your settings. On iOS, go to Settings > Apps > Safari > Advanced > Check for Apple Pay. On Mac, go to Safari > Settings > Advanced and unselect “Allow websites to check for Apple Pay and Apple Card”.
Safeguarding Your Payment Methods
Safeguarding Safari Payment Methods
To help safeguard your payment methods on the Apple ecosystem and take advantage of the benefits of Apple Pay privacy and security, your supported Apple Pay payment methods from Wallet will also be available in Safari AutoFill. When shopping online with Safari AutoFill, for websites, you can set up a virtual card number to hide your physical card number, if supported by your participating card network and issuer. To enable this functionality, Apple will send limited information about your payment method to your network or issuer (or their authorised third party), which will generate a virtual card number for your use when shopping online with Safari AutoFill. To manage your Apple Pay card numbers, including virtual card numbers, go to the back of your pass in Wallet and tap to see Card Information. You may also help to safeguard payment methods already in Safari AutoFill by paying with Apple Pay or a virtual card number rather than your physical card number. To manage, go to Settings > Wallet & Apple Pay and tap Use Apple Pay When Available. When enabled, limited information about your saved card in Safari AutoFill necessary to verify eligibility for Apple Pay will be sent to your payment network for verification. If your payment network indicates the card is eligible, Apple will add the payment method to Wallet and your network will generate an Apple Pay card number for enhanced online shopping protection.
Safeguarding Apple Account Payment Methods
To help you manage your payment methods on the Apple ecosystem, Apple may check whether any Apple Pay payment methods are eligible to be added as a payment method on file to your Apple Account and display those payment methods in Settings > [your name] > Payment & Delivery > Add Payment Method > Payment Method. When you conduct a transaction with your Apple Account, Apple may also check whether any Apple Account payment methods on file are eligible for Apple Pay. If so, to help safeguard your payment information, Apple may enable Apple Pay for that payment method. You can modify your Apple Account payment methods at any time by going to Settings > [your name] > Payment & Delivery.
Apple Transmits But Does Not Store Your Payment Information
In order to securely transmit your payment information within apps, websites and Business Chat, it is sent to Apple in encrypted form, where it is briefly decrypted and re-encrypted with a merchant-specific key, so that only the merchant, the developer or their payment processor can decrypt your payment information. When you make a payment on a Mac to which a card cannot be added, the Mac and the authorising device communicate over an encrypted channel via Apple servers. Apple does not retain any of this information in a form that personally identifies you.
Apple Pay also allows you to make payments in third-party browsers and use devices supporting Apple Pay to authorise the transaction. When using this feature, Apple will create a communication channel between the third-party browser and your authorising device via Apple servers to allow you to update your delivery and payment details, and provide your authorisation. Your delivery and billing information, and information about merchant charges, such as tax or postage fees associated with your purchase, will briefly be visible to Apple. Apple does not retain any of this information in a form that personally identifies you.
Apple Pay Order Tracking
To provide you with order tracking, upon making an Apple Pay purchase, a participating merchant sends your device-limited order information for your device to use to track your order. And, Apple provides the merchant with a merchant-specific device identifier and a push token that the merchant can use to provide the device with order updates. Apple facilitates merchant updates, but does not store order information, nor track how many, how often or which merchants send order updates. Order tracking information is stored locally on your devices and is kept up to date across devices by syncing an encrypted copy, which cannot be accessed by Apple. You can manage your Apple Pay orders at any time by tapping to view your Orders, tapping on a specific order and tapping Manage Order. You can also manage notifications about Orders by going to Orders, tapping the More button, then tapping Mute Notifications.
When you sign out of your account, your device may still retain limited information about orders for which the device is getting updates. This information will not be visible to device users, will be retained for a short time and used by your device only to help stop updates from being sent to the device after sign-out to prevent unauthorised access to your order information.
Sharing Account Activity with Third-Party Apps
You can share your Apple Card, Savings and Apple Cash account details and transaction history with participating personal financial management apps you trust from the App Store. Apps must request the ability to read your Apple Card, Savings or Apple Cash account activity from Apple Pay in Wallet. You have control over the data that you share with these apps and can change what you share at any time. Account activity that you choose to share with a third-party app will be handled in accordance with that app’s privacy policy. Apple does not see or store your account details or transaction history when you share your account activity.
Applicable Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
We process your Apple Pay personal data generally for performance of your contract with Apple, as necessary to provide the service and to comply with our legal obligations. Where consent is the appropriate legal basis, we seek it in accordance with applicable local law.
Where applicable local law provides, we process the following categories of personal data as necessary for purposes of our legitimate interests or those of a third party, including information about:
Your account, such as whether your account is active
Your device, such as the type of device, the software version and the device serial number
Your pass, such as information displayed on the pass
Your pass issuer, such as the third party authorised to provide updates to the pass
Your use of Apple Pay, for example, the number of Apple Pay passes that you have added
Your location
These legitimate interests include:
Adding and managing a pass
Helping to improve and optimise the service for you and others
Helping you to discover features that are most relevant to you
Checking eligibility
Providing you with services you request
Sending you communications about Apple Pay and other Apple products, services and offers that may be of interest to you
Preventing fraud and other malicious activity
Other Information
To determine eligibility for Wallet and Apple Pay features, when you tap a card in Wallet, Apple may check feature eligibility by looking at the country in which the card was issued and whether the issuer participates in the feature.
If you have Location Services turned on, the location of your device at the time you use it to make purchases in shops may be sent anonymously to Apple and will be used to help Apple Pay improve the accuracy of business names in the Wallet card transaction history, and may be retained in aggregate to improve Apple Maps, Apple Pay and Wallet. You can disable this location-based functionality of Apple Pay at any time on your iOS device by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Location Services > System Services and tapping to turn off Apple Pay Merchant Identification. On Mac, go to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Location Services, then click to turn off Wallet.
To help improve Apple Pay, Apple collects information about your use of Apple Pay and stores that information in a way that does not identify you personally. This information includes the time it takes you to successfully add a card or complete a transaction using Apple Pay. Apple may also use this information to improve other Apple products and services, for marketing and for fraud and security purposes.
The terms of any cardholder, user, merchant agreement or other terms and conditions applicable to the use of the features of Apple Pay will continue to govern the use of your cards and their use in connection with Apple Pay, and such terms may have additional privacy policies. Neither Apple nor its affiliates providing Apple Pay is a bank and this notice is in addition to any notices you may receive from your bank. In the event that Apple suspects fraud in connection with use of Apple Pay, information about the potentially fraudulent Apple account and transactions may be shared with your card issuer or payment network provider to prevent fraud.
Apple retains personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this notice and in accordance with Apple’s Privacy Policy, or as required by law. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest period permissible under law.
At all times, information collected by Apple will be treated in accordance with Apple’s Privacy Policy, which can be found at
apple.com/au/privacy
.
Published Date: September 20, 2024